District of Columbia statutes.
29-701.13

Consent and proxies of partners.

Action requiring the consent of partners under this chapter may be taken without a meeting, and a partner may appoint a proxy to consent or otherwise act for the partner by signing an appointment record, either personally or by the partner’s attorney in fact.

History

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
Mar. 5, 2013, D.C. Law 19-210, § 2(g)(2)(F), 59 DCR 13171

Effect of Amendments

The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-210 redesignated former § 29-701.11 as § 29-701.13.

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based on § 118 of the Uniform Limited Partnership Act (2001 Act).

Application of Law 19-210: Section 7 of D.C. Law 19-210 provided that the act shall apply as of January 1, 2012.